Hawaii statutes.
[§339-10] Injunction to restrain violation.
In addition to the remedies provided in this chapter, the director may apply to
the circuit environmental court for a temporary or permanent injunction
restraining any person from violating any provision of this chapter. [L Sp 1977
1st, c 2, pt of §2; am L 2014, c 218, §8.]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next